src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON 3PIIVTAS** WG for NEP,  no triggers for the other cases 

* **LEXICON 3PIIVTAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON 3PIIVTAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON 3DUSSEPIIVTAS**  piivtâš itself is not in the 3PIIVTAS lexicon 

* **LEXICON X_VEESKIR_SG** 

* **LEXICON 3KAAVPUG** 

* **LEXICON 3AARRAN** 

* **LEXICON 3AARRAN_SG** 

* **LEXICON 3AARRAN_PL** plurals for 3AARRAN 

* **LEXICON X_AARRAN_SG** 

* **LEXICON 3RUONAS** ruonâs:ruonâs, nuurras WG NEP,  blank for the rest 

* **LEXICON X_RUONAS** WG NEP,  blank for the rest 

* **LEXICON 3VUONJAS**  kierâš, stem: kierrâ, px kierâččâm 

* **LEXICON 3CEVE** only for this lemma. It could go to 3LYEME but needs modifications of rules to get iä:e and -tt-, and the worst part is v:vv 

* **LEXICON 3LYEME** 

* **LEXICON 3HUKSIM** NGA + Abe blank, SLEN for the rest 

* **LEXICON 3HUKSIM_SG** NGA + Abe blank, SLEN for the rest 

* **LEXICON 3HUKSIM_PL** plurals for 3HUKSIM 

* **LEXICON 3KIEDAVUSSAM** stem: :kieđâvušš 

* **LEXICON 3POOVSA**  soovsa 

* **LEXICON 3POOVSA_SG**  soovsa 

* **LEXICON 3POOVSA_PL**  plurals for 3POOVSA 

## Contracted stems 

* **LEXICON C_KAAMUV** 

* **LEXICON X_KAAMUV** 

* **LEXICON X_KAAMUV_COMMON** 

* **LEXICON C_POOVIJC** 

* **LEXICON 3POOVIJ** 

* **LEXICON C_OLMOOS** lexicon for olmooš 

* **LEXICON C_OLMOOS_PL** 

* **LEXICON C_KAARBIS** 

* **LEXICON X_KAARBIS** 

* **LEXICON C_KAARBIS_SG** 

* **LEXICON C_KAARBIS_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_KAARBIS_SG** 

* **LEXICON C_PELES** 

* **LEXICON X_PELES** piällás^ÁE

* **LEXICON C_MORCES** 

* **LEXICON X_MORCES** 

* **LEXICON C_CUNOI** 

* **LEXICON C_PUASUI** 

* **LEXICON C_ALMAI** 

* **LEXICON C_KUAVSUI** 

* **LEXICON C_KUAVSUI_COMMON** 

* **LEXICON C_CUANJA** 

* **LEXICON CUANJA_COMMON** 

* **LEXICON X_SVSLENh_PL** 

* **LEXICON S_AAIGA** Almost identical with S_AAJA, except for Compounds 

* **LEXICON AAIGA_COMMON_SG** 

* **LEXICON S_AAIGA_PL** 

* **LEXICON AAIGA_COMMON_PL** 

* **LEXICON S_AAJA** 

* **LEXICON S_KARRII** 

* **LEXICON X_KARRII** 

* **LEXICON S_SPAALVAS** 

* **LEXICON S_TUULAS** ! stem: ku^RVđi 

* **LEXICON X_TUULAS** 

* **LEXICON S_TUULAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON S_TUULAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_TUULAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON X_TUULAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON S_KAANDAS** stem: ka^RVnd 

* **LEXICON X_KAANDAS** 

* **LEXICON S_KAANDAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON S_KAANDAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_KAANDAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON X_KAANDAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON S_KUULMIS** stem kuovtt 

* **LEXICON S_CISSAAS** ! stem: cissá 

* **LEXICON X_CISSAAS** stem čissá

* **LEXICON S_VUALAAS** 

* **LEXICON X_VUALAAS** 

* **LEXICON S_KUAVDAS**  WG or not? vuáŋŋáš not WG, kiärpáš WG. stem: suábbá 

* **LEXICON S_KUAVDAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON S_KUAVDAS_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_KUAVDAS_SG** 

* **LEXICON S_ALGAAS** stem alga 

* **LEXICON S_KUADHUS** 

* **LEXICON S_KAAHUS** 

* **LEXICON X_KAAHUS_notILL** 

* **LEXICON S_SUOLLUS** 

* **LEXICON X_SUOLLUS** 

* **LEXICON 4C_RASTAGAS** splitting in sg and pl 

    - *LEXICON 4C_RASTAGAS_SG*  the sg ones 

    - *LEXICON 4C_RASTAGAS_PL*  the pl ones 

    - *LEXICON X_RASTAGAS* sg cases 

* **LEXICON 3OPPUS** 

* **LEXICON 3ALMAS** 

* **LEXICON ALMAS_COMMON** 

* **LEXICON C_SARVES** sarves, jalŋes 

* **LEXICON C_SARVES_SG** 

* **LEXICON C_SARVES_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_SARVES_SG** 

* **LEXICON X_SARVES_PL** 

### 4-syllabic 

* **LEXICON 4JOTOLAH**  splitting in sg pl 

* **LEXICON JOHTOLAH_OBL** common for N and A 

* **LEXICON 4JOTOLAH_PL** 

* **LEXICON 4KAPULUH** 

* **LEXICON 4KUBALOH** 

* **LEXICON 4LAS_NOUN** stem = aanaarl 

* **LEXICON LAS_COMMON** 

* **LEXICON X_LAS_COMMON_SG** normâl lâš:-lii-nouns and adjs 

* **LEXICON X_LAS_COMMON_PL** NOrmal plural and plural tantum cases, olympialiih 

* **LEXICON OLYMPIALIIH_PL** 

* **LEXICON LAS_SUF** 

* **LEXICON MUS_NOUN** type uáiváámus, aldemus 

## Contracted stems 

* **LEXICON C_EIJE** 

* **LEXICON C_LOHHEE** 

* **LEXICON C_LOHHEE_SG** redirects to  C_TAHHEE, but adds NomAg 

* **LEXICON C_LOHHEE_PL** redirects to  C_TAHHEE, but adds NomAg 

* **LEXICON C_TAHHEE** 

* **LEXICON C_TAHHEE_SG** 

* **LEXICON C_TAHHEE_PL** 

* **LEXICON X_TAHHEE** ee-final contract, -ei instead of -ij not-nomen-agentis 

* **LEXICON X_TAHHEE_SG** ee-final contract, -ei instead of -ij 

* **LEXICON X_TAHHEE_PL** ee-final contract, plural forms 

## Comitative plural variation 

* **LEXICON GUIN** is here to give -guin and the Use/NG -gijn. 

## Derivations 

TODO: Move derivation lexica here 

### Diminutive derivations _DIM

### 2 syllabic stems

#### final â

* **LEXICON 2JUUHA_SG_DIM** (a lexicon to create deminutives; Not for lexicalised words already being in deminutive) 

* **LEXICON 2ALGA_SG_DIM** a^RVlgâ done witout FVD, both ways work

* **LEXICON 2ALGA_PL_DIM**  a^RVlgâ

* **LEXICON 2KIELA_DIM** done with FVD, both ways work

#### final á

* **LEXICON FADDA_SG_DIM** fá^RVddá 

* **LEXICON 2FADDA_PL_DIM** 

* **LEXICON 2KISSA_DIM** 

#### final e

* **LEXICON 2ALGE_SG_DIM**  a^RVlge alge, mo^RVkk4e mokke

* **LEXICON 2ALGE_PL_DIM** 

#### Final i

* ''LEXICON 2AIGI_SG_DIM''  pe^RVi4vi, ä^RVi4gi

* ''LEXICON 2AIGI_PL_DIM'' 

#### final u , tentative

* **LEXICON 2AIRU_SG_DIM** a^RVlgâ 

* **LEXICON 2AIRU_PL_DIM** 

* **LEXICON 2LAAVU_DIM** 

### contracted stem, final â, 

* **LEXICON 2AAIGA_DIM** 

### 3-syllabic

3LITTER --> 4C_RASTAGAS

### 4-syllabic

tbw.

### 4-syllabic contracted

tbw.

### Vowel-final loanwords

tbw.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
